Utah statutes.
4-20-3.   Rangeland Improvement Fund distribution.
(1)  The department shall distribute fund monies as provided in this section.
(a)  The department shall:
(i)  distribute pro rata to each school district the monies received by the
state under Subsection 4-20-2(1)(b)(i) from the sale or lease of public lands
based upon the amount of revenue generated from the sale or lease of public
lands within the district; and
(ii)  ensure that all monies generated from the sale or lease of public lands
within a school district are credited and deposited to the general school fund
of that school district.
(b) (i)  After the commissioner approves a request from a regional board, the
department shall distribute pro rata to each regional board monies received by
the state under Subsection 4-20-2(1)(b)(i) from fees based upon the amount of
revenue generated from the imposition of fees within that grazing district.
(ii)  The regional board shall expend monies received in accordance with
Subsection (2).
(c) (i)  The department shall distribute or expend monies received by the
state under Subsections 4-20-2(1)(b)(ii) through (iv) for the purposes
outlined in Subsection (2).
(ii)  The department may require entities seeking funding from sources
outlined in Subsections 4-20-2(1)(b)(ii) through (iv) to provide matching
funds.
(2)  The department shall ensure that fund distributions or expenditures under
Subsections (1)(b) and (c) are used for:
(a)  range improvement and maintenance;
(b)  the control of predatory and depredating animals;
(c)  the control, management, or extermination of invading species, range
damaging organisms, and poisonous or noxious weeds;
(d)  the purchase or lease of lands for the benefit of a grazing district;
(e)  watershed protection, development, distribution, and improvement; and
(f)  the general welfare of livestock grazing within a grazing district.
